New Jersey, session 222, A4756.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any provision of section 12 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-60), P.L.2007, c.340 (C.26:2C-45 et al.), or any law, rule, regulation, or order adopted pursuant thereto to the contrary, in the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2026, the Board of Public Utilities and the Department of Environmental Protection shall, from available balances accumulated in accounts of the board from funds collected through the societal benefits charge imposed pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-60) and from available balances accumulated in accounts of the department through Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative allowances purchased and credited to the Global Warming Solutions Fund pursuant to P.L.2007, c.340 (C.26:2C-45 et al.), allocate $300 million to finance one or more grants to support the construction of small modular nuclear reactors in the State. b.  As used in this act, small modular reactor or SMR means a nuclear fission reactor that: (1) has a rated electric generating capacity of no more than 300 megawatts; (2) is capable of being constructed and operated either alone or in combination with one or more similar reactors if additional reactors are or become necessary at a single site; and (3) is licensed by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire on June 30, 2027.